Utah statutes.
70A-9a-342.    Bank's right to refuse to enter into or disclose existence of
control agreement.
This chapter does not require a bank to enter into an agreement of the kind
described in Subsection 70A-9a-104(1)(b), even if its customer so requests or
directs.  A bank that has entered into such an agreement is not required to
confirm the existence of the agreement to another person unless requested to
do so by its customer.
